Arkansas, session 2025, SB42.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Office of the Lieutenant Governor for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) CHIEF OF STAFF/LEGAL COUNSEL 1 $104,500
(2) COMMUNICATIONS/POLICY DIRECTOR 1 $77,000
(3) LT. GOV. SECURITY OFFICER 2 $75,000
(4) EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT/SCHEDULER 1 $44,000
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 5

*JAR013*
01/07/2025 2:21:06 PM JAR013

SB42
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Office of the Lieutenant Governor, to be payable from the State
Central Services Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Office of the Lieutenant Governor for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $379,600
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 129,773
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 52,304
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 11,234
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $572,911

SECTION 3. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 4. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.
01/07/2025 2:21:06 PM JAR013

SB42

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.
























01/07/2025 2:21:06 PM JAR013